Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP

7-62-201. Certificates - contents - filing with secretary of state.

In order to form a limited partnership, a certificate of limited partnership shall be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. The certificate of limited partnership shall state:

The domestic entity name of the limited partnership, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the limited partnership's initial registered agent;

The true name and mailing address of each general partner;

The principal office address of the limited partnership's initial principal office;

That there are at least two partners in the partnership, at least one of whom is a limited partner; and

Any other matters relating to the limited partnership or the certificate the general partners determine to include therein.

A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership in the office of the secretary of state, or at any later time not more than ninety days after the date of the filing of the certificate, stated in the certificate of limited partnership, if, in either case, there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 436, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1) R&RE, p. 450, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 952, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1821, § 38, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1685, § 36, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a) to (1)(c), (1)(e), and (2) amended and (1)(c.5) added, p. 2242, § 126, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, p. 1440, § 125, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) amended, p. 850, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(c) amended, p. 19, § 3, effective August 5.

7-62-202. Amendment to certificate.

A limited partnership may amend its certificate of limited partnership by delivering a certificate of amendment to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, stating:

The domestic entity name of the limited partnership; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1440, § 126, effective July 1, 2004.)

The amendment to the certificate.

Within thirty days after the happening of any of the following events, an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event or events shall be filed:

The admission of a new general partner; or

The withdrawal of a general partner.

A general partner who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made or that any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the certificate inaccurate in any respect, including but not limited to a change in the registered agent name or registered agent address of the registered agent, shall promptly amend the certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose the general partners may determine.

No person has any liability because an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership has not been filed in the records of the secretary of state to reflect the occurrence of any event referred to in subsection (2) or (3) of this section if the amendment is filed within the time periods specified.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 437, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1)(b) and (3) amended and (2) R&RE, p. 450, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (3), and (5) amended, p. 2242, § 127, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, p. 1440, § 126, effective July 1.

7-62-203. Statement of dissolution.

Upon the dissolution of the partnership or at any time there are no limited partners, the partnership shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of dissolution stating:

The domestic entity name of the limited partnership;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2243, § 128, effective July 1, 2004.)

The principal office address of the limited partnership's principal office; and

That the partnership is dissolved.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1441, § 127, effective July 1, 2004.)

The statement of dissolution shall not affect the limited liability of the partners during the period of winding up and termination of the partnership.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 438, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1)(b) and (1)(e) amended, p. 450, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1499, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 952, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(b) to (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 2243, § 128, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b.5) added and (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended, p. 1441, § 127, effective July 1.

7-62-204. Approval of certificates.

Certificates and statements required by this article to be filed in the office of the secretary of state shall be approved in the following manner:

An original certificate of limited partnership shall be approved by all general partners;

A certificate of amendment shall be approved by at least one general partner and by each other general partner designated in the certificate as a new general partner; and

A statement of dissolution shall be approved by all general partners or, if there are no general partners as a result of the application of section 7-62-402, by any person authorized under the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, by a person designated by a majority of the limited partners.

Any person may approve a certificate or statement by an attorney-in-fact.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1821, § 39, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1686, § 37, effective October 1, 2002.)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 438, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (3) amended, p. 451, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1821, § 39, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1686, § 37, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (2) amended, p. 2243, § 129, effective July 1, 2004.

Cross references:

For penalties for perjury, see part 5 of article 8 of title 18.

7-62-205. Presumptions.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2244, § 130, effective July 1, 2004.)

For the purposes of this subsection (2), the definitions in section

7-62-101

shall apply; except that:

"General partner" includes a partner who is identified or otherwise classified as a general partner by or in accordance with the agreement of the partners, notwithstanding any delay or failure to file an original certificate of limited partnership naming the general partner as such.

"Limited partner" includes a partner who is identified or otherwise classified as a limited partner by or in accordance with the agreement of the partners, notwithstanding any delay or failure to file an original certificate of limited partnership.

"Limited partnership" includes a partnership before the filing of the original certificate of limited partnership with the secretary of state and in which there is at least one general partner and one limited partner.

"Partner" includes a person who enters into the agreement contemplated in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) as a co-owner with the rights of a general partner or a limited partner or who acquires an interest in a limited partnership as a co-owner with such rights.

The presumptions set forth in this subsection (2) shall apply to each limited partnership whose partners enter into an agreement on or after October 31, 1981, to form such limited partnership, and to which a contribution is made by or on behalf of one or more of such partners before the filing of an original certificate of limited partnership for such partnership.

It shall be presumed that the partners of such limited partnership shall have agreed that:

The relationship of the partners with respect to any contributions made to the partnership and relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership shall be the same as if a certificate of limited partnership had been filed pursuant to section

7-62-201

at the time the partners entered into the agreement contemplated in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2); and

The general partners of such limited partnership shall approve such certificate and that the same shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2244, § 130, effective July 1, 2004.)

The failure or refusal of the general partners to approve such certificate or to deliver such certificate to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, shall entitle any partner to obtain a court order pursuant to section

7-90-313

approving an appropriate certificate and ordering the secretary of state to file the approved certificate.

The presumptions set forth in this subsection (2) shall apply to such a limited partnership, notwithstanding any one or more provisions of any agreement of the partners of such limited partnership that:

The term of such partnership shall commence upon the filing of such certificate;

An agreement sets forth the entire understanding of the parties; or

The agreement of the parties shall be in writing.

The presumption set forth in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (2) shall not apply in an action for damages against a general partner by the other partners based on any delay or failure in the filing of a certificate of limited partnership.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 439, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section R&RE, p. 451, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 143, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 2002:

(1), (2)(c)(II), (2)(c)(III), and (2)(e) amended, p. 1822, § 40, effective July 1; (1), (2)(c)(II), (2)(c)(III), and (2)(e) amended, p. 1686, § 38, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2)(c) amended and (2)(c.5) added, p. 2244, § 130, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-206. Filing in office of secretary of state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 439, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 451, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-62-207. Liability for false statement in certificate.

If any certificate of limited partnership, certificate of amendment, or statement of dissolution containing a false statement is delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any general partner who knew or should have known the certificate of limited partnership, certificate of amendment, or statement of dissolution to be false at the time the same was approved; and

Any general partner who thereafter knows or should have known that any statement in the certificate of limited partnership, certificate of amendment, or statement of dissolution has changed, making the same inaccurate in any respect within a sufficient time before the certificate of limited partnership, certificate of amendment, or statement of dissolution was relied upon reasonably to have enabled that general partner to correct the inaccuracy or to file a petition for its correction under section 7-90-313.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 439, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 1822, § 41, effective July 1; IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 1687, § 39, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, p. 2244, § 131, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1441, § 128, effective July 1.

7-62-208. Notice of existence of limited partnership.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file in the records of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and is notice of all other facts stated therein that are required to be stated in a certificate of limited partnership by section 7-62-201 (1).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 439, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 451, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2245, § 132, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1441, § 129, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 850, § 10, effective July 1.

7-62-209. Delivery of certificates to limited partners - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 439, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1823, § 42, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1687, § 40, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-62-210. Merger and consolidation of limited partnerships - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 452, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(3) amended, p. 1823, § 43, effective July 1; IP(3) amended, p. 1687, § 41, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)